Indiana, session 2026, SB288.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-2-21.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 21.2. Leave for Organ Donation
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "employee" means a person
employed or permitted to work or perform services for
remuneration under a contract of hire, written or oral, by an
employer.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "employer" means the following:
(1) A sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, or other entity with one (1) or more
employees.
(2) A state agency.
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "state agency" means an
authority, board, branch, commission, committee, department,
division, or other instrumentality of any of the following:
2026 IN 288—LS 6684/DI 153


(1) The executive, including the administrative department of
state government.
(2) The legislative department of state government.
(3) The judicial department of state government.
(4) A state educational institution.
(5) A body corporate and politic created by statute.
Sec. 4. (a) An employee who has been employed by an employer
for at least twelve (12) months is entitled to an unpaid leave of
absence for organ donation, including recovery and testing, as
provided in this chapter.
(b) A leave of absence under this chapter may not exceed a total
of thirty (30) working days per calendar year.
(c) An eligible employee may elect, or an employer may require
the employee, to substitute any earned paid leave, except medical
or sick leave, for the leave provided under this chapter.
Sec. 5. An eligible employee who wants to take a leave of
absence under this chapter shall provide written notice to the
employee's employer of the date the leave will begin. An employee
shall give at least thirty (30) days notice before the date on which
the employee intends to begin the leave.
Sec. 6. Nothing in this chapter restricts an employer from
providing:
(1) more than thirty (30) working days of leave per calendar
year; or
(2) paid leave.
Sec. 7. An employer may not retaliate against an employee for
requesting or obtaining a leave of absence under this chapter.
Sec. 8. If an employee is eligible to take a leave of absence under
this chapter and IC 4-15-16, the employee may only take leave
under IC 4-15-16.
2026 IN 288—LS 6684/DI 153